Massachusetts, session 194th, H3202.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (l) of section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word "persons;" in line 182, the words
"sales of personal safety devices and personal safety call services;"
of 1